District of Columbia statutes.
29A-1128

Repealed

Application of chapter.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-185, § 9, 35 DCR 7906
April 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1002, 45 DCR 1172
Smoke detector requirements, see § 6-751.02.
2001 Ed., § 29-1128.
1981 Ed., § 29-1208.